Washington statutes.
RCW 23.86.195

Cooperative associations organized under other statutes—Reorganization under chapter.

Any cooperative association organized under any other statute may be reorganized under the provisions of this chapter by adopting and filing amendments to its articles of incorporation in accordance with the provisions of this chapter for amending articles of incorporation. The articles of incorporation as amended must conform to the requirements of this chapter, and shall state that the cooperative association accepts the benefits and will be bound by the provisions of this chapter.

[ 1989 c 307 s 26; 1981 c 297 s 38.]

NOTES:

Legislative finding—1989 c 307: See note following RCW 23.86.007.

Severability—1981 c 297: See note following RCW 15.36.201.